California statutes. Civil Code
(iv) The provider refrains from disclosing any personal information pursuant to the court order until it provides, in a timely manner, notice to the user about the issuance of the order and the ability to appear and quash the order, and the user has been given a minimum of 35 days prior to disclosure of the information within which to appear and quash the order.

(3) A provider shall disclose the personal information of a user to any person, private entity, or government entity if the user has given his or her informed, affirmative consent to the specific disclosure for a particular purpose.

(4) A provider may disclose personal information of a user to a government entity, if the government entity asserts, and the provider in good faith believes, that there is an imminent danger of death or serious physical injury requiring the immediate disclosure of the requested personal information and there is insufficient time to obtain a court order. The government entity seeking the disclosure shall provide the provider with a written statement setting forth the facts giving rise to the emergency upon request or no later than 48 hours after seeking disclosure.

(5) A provider may disclose
 personal information of a user to a government entity if the provider in good faith believes that the personal information is evidence directly related and relevant to a crime against the provider or that user.

(d) (1) Any court issuing a court order requiring the disclosure of personal information of a user shall impose appropriate safeguards against the unauthorized disclosure of personal information by the provider and by the person, private entity, or government entity seeking disclosure pursuant to the order.

(2) The court may, in its discretion, quash or modify a court order requiring the disclosure of the user’s personal information upon a motion made by the user, provider, person, or entity seeking disclosure.

(e) A provider, upon the request of a law enforcement entity, shall take all
 necessary steps to preserve records and other evidence in its possession of a user’s personal information related to the use of a book or part of a book, pending the issuance of a court order or a warrant pursuant to this section or Section 1798.90.05. The provider shall retain the records and evidence for a period of 90 days from the date of the request by the law enforcement entity, which shall be extended for an additional 90-day period upon a renewed request by the law enforcement entity.

(f) Except in an action for a violation of this section, no evidence obtained in violation of this section shall be admissible in any civil or administrative proceeding.

(g) (1) Violations of this section shall be subject to the following penalties:

(A) Any provider that knowingly provides personal
 information about a user to a government entity in violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, which shall be paid to the user in a civil action brought by the user.

(B) Any provider that knowingly provides personal information about a user to a government entity in violation of this section shall, in addition to the penalty prescribed by subparagraph (A), be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General, by any district attorney or city attorney, or by a city prosecutor in any city having a full-time city prosecutor, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) If an action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of
 the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(3) The penalties provided by this section are not the exclusive remedy and do not affect any other relief or remedy provided by law.

(4) A civil action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within two years after the date upon which the claimant first discovered the violation.

(h) An objectively reasonable reliance by the provider on a
 warrant or court order for the disclosure of personal information of a user, or on any of the enumerated exceptions to the confidentiality of a user’s personal information set forth in this section, is a complete defense to any civil action for the violation of this section.

(i) (1) Unless disclosure of information pertaining to a particular request or set of requests is specifically prohibited by law, a provider shall prepare a report including all of the following information, to the extent it can be reasonably determined:

(A) The number of federal and state warrants, federal and state grand jury subpoenas, federal and state civil and administrative subpoenas, federal and state civil and criminal court orders, and requests for information made with the informed consent of the user as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), seeking disclosure of any
 personal information of a user related to the access or use of a book service or book, received by the provider from January 1 to December 31, inclusive, of the previous year.

(B) The number of disclosures made by the provider pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c) from January 1 to December 31, inclusive, of the previous year.

(C) For each category of demand or disclosure, the provider shall include all of the following information:

(i) The number of times notice of a court order in a criminal, civil, or administrative action has been provided by the provider and the date the notice was provided.

(ii) The number of times personal information has been disclosed by the provider.

(iii) The number of times no personal information has been disclosed by the provider.

(iv) The number of times the provider contests the demand.

(v) The number of times the user contests the demand.

(vi) The number of users whose personal information was disclosed by the provider.

(vii) The type of personal information that was disclosed and the number of times that type of personal information was disclosed.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a provider is not required to prepare a report pursuant to this subdivision unless it has disclosed personal information related to the access or use of a book service or book of more than 30 total users consisting of users located in this
 state or users whose location is unknown or of both types of users.

(3) The reporting requirements of this subdivision shall not apply to information disclosed to a government entity that is made by a provider serving a postsecondary educational institution when the provider is required to disclose the information in order to be reimbursed for the sale or rental of a book that was purchased or rented by a student using book vouchers or other financial aid subsidies for books.

(j) Reports prepared pursuant to subdivision (i) shall be made publicly available in an online, searchable format on or before March 1 of each year. If the provider does not have an Internet Web site, the provider shall post the reports prominently on its premises or send the reports to the Office of Privacy Protection on or before March 1 of each year.

(k) On or before March 1 of each year, a provider subject to Section 22575 of the Business and Professions Code shall complete one of the following actions:

(1) Create a prominent hyperlink to its latest report prepared pursuant to subdivision (i) in the disclosure section of its privacy policy applicable to its book service.

(2) Post the report prepared pursuant to subdivision (i) in the section of its Internet Web site explaining the way in which user information and privacy issues related to its book service are addressed.

(3) State on its Internet Web site in one of the areas described in paragraphs (1) and (2) that no report prepared pursuant to subdivision (i) is available because the provider is exempt from the reporting requirement pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i).

(l) Nothing in this section shall otherwise affect the rights of any person under the California Constitution or any other law or be construed as conflicting with the federal Privacy Protection Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. 2000aa et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   (SB 602)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.90.05.

Section 1798.90 does not make it unlawful for a law enforcement entity subject to Section 2000aa of Title 42 of the United States Code to obtain a search warrant for the personal information of a user pursuant to otherwise applicable law in connection with the investigation or prosecution of a criminal offense when probable cause exists to believe that the person possessing the personal information has committed, or is committing, a criminal offense involving the production,
 possession, receipt, mailing, sale, distribution, shipment, or transportation of child pornography, the sexual exploitation of children, or the sale or purchase of children prohibited by Sections 2251, 2251A, 2252, and 2252A of Title 18 of the United States Code. Nothing in Section 1798.90 shall prevent a provider from complying with a proper search warrant issued by a duly authorized court in connection with the investigation or prosecution of any of those offenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   (SB 602)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.2. CONFIDENTIALITY OF DRIVER'S LICENSE INFORMATION [1798.90.1. - 1798.90.1.]

1798.90.1.

(a) (1) A business may scan or swipe a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles in any electronic device for the following purposes:

(A) To verify age or the authenticity of the driver’s license or identification card.

(B) To comply with a legal requirement to record, retain, or transmit that information.

(C) To transmit information to a check service company for the purpose of approving negotiable instruments, electronic funds transfers, or similar methods of payments, provided that only the name and identification number from the license or the card may be used or retained by the check service company.

(D) To collect or disclose personal information that is required for reporting, investigating, or preventing fraud, abuse, or material misrepresentation.

(2) (A) An organ procurement organization may scan or swipe a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles in any electronic device to transmit information to the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor
 Registry established pursuant to Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety Code for the purposes of allowing an individual to identify himself or herself as a registered organ donor. Information gathered or transmitted pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with the Department of Motor Vehicles Information Security Agreement.

(B) Prior to scanning or swiping a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, an organ procurement organization shall provide clear and conspicuous notice to the applicant and shall follow the procedure prescribed in this subparagraph:

(i) Once the applicant’s information is populated on the electronic form, the applicant shall verify that the information is accurate and shall click “submit” after reading a clear and conspicuous consent message, which shall not be combined with or contained within another message,
 acknowledging that the applicant’s information will be used for the sole purpose of being added to the registry.

(ii) The applicant shall provide his or her signature to complete registration.

(iii) The organization or registry system shall provide a written confirmation to the applicant confirming that he or she is signed up as an organ and tissue donor.

(3) A business or organ procurement organization shall not retain or use any of the information obtained by that electronic means for any purpose other than as provided herein.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Business” means a proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or any other form of commercial enterprise.

(2) “Organ procurement organization” means a person designated by the Secretary of the federal Department of Health and Human Services as an organ procurement organization.

(c) A violation of this section constitutes a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for no more than one year, or by a fine of no more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 548, Sec. 1.   (AB 2769)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.23. COLLECTION OF LICENSE PLATE INFORMATION [1798.90.5. - 1798.90.55.]

1798.90.5.

The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this title:

(a) “Automated license plate recognition end-user” or “ALPR end-user” means a person that accesses or uses an ALPR system, but does not include any of the following:

(1) A transportation agency when subject to Section 31490 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(2) A person that is subject to Sections 6801 to 6809, inclusive, of Title 15 of the United States Code and state or federal statutes or regulations implementing those sections, if the person is subject to compliance oversight by a state or federal regulatory agency with respect to those sections.

(3) A person, other than a law enforcement agency, to whom information may be disclosed as a permissible use pursuant to Section 2721 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(b) “Automated license plate recognition information,” or “ALPR information” means information or data collected through the use of an ALPR system.

(c) “Automated license plate recognition operator” or “ALPR operator” means a person that operates an ALPR system, but does not include a
 transportation agency when subject to Section 31490 of the Streets and Highways Code. 

(d) “Automated license plate recognition system” or “ALPR system” means a searchable computerized database resulting from the operation of one or more mobile or fixed cameras combined with computer algorithms to read and convert images of registration plates and the characters they contain into computer-readable data.

(e) “Person” means any natural person, public agency, partnership, firm, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity.

(f) “Public agency” means the state, any city, county, or city and county, or any agency or political subdivision of the state or a city, county, or city and county, including, but not limited to, a law enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.90.51.

An ALPR operator shall do all of the following:

(a) Maintain reasonable security procedures and practices, including operational, administrative, technical, and physical safeguards, to protect ALPR information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(b) (1) Implement a usage and privacy policy in
 order to ensure that the collection, use, maintenance, sharing, and dissemination of ALPR information is consistent with respect for individuals’ privacy and civil liberties. The usage and privacy policy shall be available to the public in writing, and, if the ALPR operator has an Internet Web site, the usage and privacy policy shall be posted conspicuously on that Internet Web site.

(2) The usage and privacy policy shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(A) The authorized purposes for using the ALPR system and collecting ALPR information.

(B) A description of the job title or other designation of the employees and independent contractors who are authorized to use or access the ALPR system, or to collect ALPR information. The policy shall identify the training requirements necessary for those authorized
 employees and independent contractors.

(C) A description of how the ALPR system will be monitored to ensure the security of the information and compliance with applicable privacy laws.

(D) The purposes of, process for, and restrictions on, the sale, sharing, or transfer of ALPR information to other persons.

(E) The title of the official custodian, or owner, of the ALPR system responsible for implementing this section.

(F) A description of the reasonable measures that will be used to ensure the accuracy of ALPR information and correct data errors.

(G) The length of time ALPR information will be retained, and the process the ALPR operator will utilize to determine if and when to destroy
 retained ALPR information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.90.52.

If an ALPR operator accesses or provides access to ALPR information, the ALPR operator shall do both of the following:

(a) Maintain a record of that access. At a minimum, the record shall include all of the following:

(1) The date and time the information is accessed.

(2) The license plate
 number or other data elements used to query the ALPR system.

(3) The username of the person who accesses the information, and, as applicable, the organization or entity with whom the person is affiliated.

(4) The purpose for accessing the information. 

(b) Require that ALPR information only be used for the authorized purposes described in the usage and privacy policy required by subdivision (b) of Section 1798.90.51.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.90.53.

An ALPR end-user shall do all of the following:

(a) Maintain reasonable security procedures and practices, including operational, administrative, technical, and physical safeguards, to protect ALPR information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(b) (1) Implement a usage and privacy policy in
 order to ensure that the access, use, sharing, and dissemination of ALPR information is consistent with respect for individuals’ privacy and civil liberties. The usage and privacy policy shall be available to the public in writing, and, if the ALPR end-user has an Internet Web site, the usage and privacy policy shall be posted conspicuously on that Internet Web site.

(2) The usage and privacy policy shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(A) The authorized purposes for accessing and using ALPR information.

(B) A description of the job title or other designation of the employees and independent contractors who are authorized to access and use ALPR information. The policy shall identify the training requirements necessary for those authorized employees and independent contractors.

(C) A description of how the ALPR system will be monitored to ensure the security of the information accessed or used, and compliance with all applicable privacy laws and a process for periodic system audits.

(D) The purposes of, process for, and restrictions on, the sale, sharing, or transfer of ALPR information to other persons.

(E) The title of the official custodian, or owner, of the ALPR information responsible for implementing this section.

(F) A description of the reasonable measures that will be used to ensure the accuracy of ALPR information and correct data errors.

(G) The length of time ALPR information will be retained, and the process the ALPR end-user will utilize to determine
 if and when to destroy retained ALPR information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.90.54.

(a) In addition to any other sanctions, penalties, or remedies provided by law, an individual who has been harmed by a violation of this title, including, but not limited to, unauthorized access or use of ALPR information or a breach of security of an ALPR system, may bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a person who knowingly caused the harm.

(b) The court may
 award a combination of any one or more of the following:

(1) Actual damages, but not less than liquidated damages in the amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(2) Punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of the law.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.

(4) Other preliminary and equitable relief as the court determines to be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.90.55.

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation:

(a) A public agency that operates or intends to operate an ALPR system shall provide an opportunity for public comment at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the governing body of the public agency before implementing the program.

(b) A public agency shall not sell, share, or transfer ALPR information,
 except to another public agency, and only as otherwise permitted by law. For purposes of this section, the provision of data hosting or towing services shall not be considered the sale, sharing, or transferring of ALPR information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 532, Sec. 3.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.25. CONSUMER PRIVACY PROTECTION [1798.91. - 1798.91.]

1798.91.

(a) For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Direct marketing purposes” means the use of personal information for marketing or advertising products, goods, or services directly to individuals. “Direct marketing purposes” does not include the use of personal information (A) by bona fide tax exempt charitable
 or religious organizations to solicit charitable contributions or (B) to raise funds from and communicate with individuals regarding politics and government.

(2) “Medical information” means any individually identifiable information, in electronic or physical form, regarding the individual’s medical history, or medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional. “Individually identifiable” means that the medical information includes or contains any element of personal identifying information sufficient to allow identification of the individual, such as the individual’s name, address, electronic mail address, telephone number, or social security number, or other information that, alone or in combination with other publicly available information, reveals the individual’s identity. For purposes of this section, “medical information” does not mean a subscription to, purchase of, or request for a periodical, book, pamphlet, video, audio, or
 other multimedia product or nonprofit association information.

(3) “Clear and conspicuous” means in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language.

(4) For purposes of this section, the collection of medical information online constitutes “in writing.” For purposes of this section, “written consent” includes consent obtained online.

(b) A business may not orally request medical information directly from an individual regardless of whether the information pertains to the individual or not, and use, share, or otherwise disclose that information for direct marketing purposes, without doing both of the following prior to obtaining that
 information:

(1) Orally disclosing to the individual in the same conversation during which the business seeks to obtain the information, that it is obtaining the information to market or advertise products, goods, or services to the individual.

(2) Obtaining the consent of either the individual to whom the information pertains or a person legally authorized to consent for the individual, to permit his or her medical information to be used or shared to market or advertise products, goods, or services to the individual, and making and maintaining for two years after the date of the conversation, an audio recording of the entire conversation.

(c) A business may not request in writing medical information directly from an individual regardless of whether the information pertains to the individual or not, and use, share,
 or otherwise disclose that information for direct marketing purposes, without doing both of the following prior to obtaining that information:

(1) Disclosing in a clear and conspicuous manner that it is obtaining the information to market or advertise products, goods, or services to the individual.

(2) Obtaining the written consent of either the individual to whom the information pertains or a person legally authorized to consent for the individual, to permit his or her medical information to be used or shared to market or advertise products, goods, or services to the individual.

(d) This section does not apply to a provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor, as defined in Section 56.05.

(e) This section shall not apply to an
 insurance institution, agent, or support organization, as defined in Section 791.02 of the Insurance Code, when engaged in an insurance transaction, as defined in Section 791.02 of the Insurance Code, pursuant to all the requirements of Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.

(f) This section does not apply to a telephone corporation, as defined in Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code, when that corporation is engaged in providing telephone services and products pursuant to Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2 of the Public Utilities Code, if the corporation does not share or disclose medical information obtained as a consequence of complying with those sections of the Public Utilities Code, to third parties for direct marketing purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 444, Sec. 7.   (SB 138)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.26. Security of Connected Devices [1798.91.04. - 1798.91.06.]

1798.91.04.

(a) A manufacturer of a connected device shall equip the device with a reasonable security feature or features that are all of the following:

(1) Appropriate to the nature and function of the device.

(2) Appropriate to the information it may collect, contain, or transmit.

(3) Designed to protect the device and any information contained therein from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(b) Subject to all of the requirements of subdivision (a), if a connected
 device is equipped with a means for authentication outside a local area network, it shall be deemed a reasonable security feature under subdivision (a) if either of the following requirements are met:

(1) The preprogrammed password is unique to each device manufactured.

(2) The device contains a security feature that requires a user to generate a new means of authentication before access is granted to the device for the first time.

(c) A manufacturer of a connected device may elect to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a)
 by ensuring the connected device does all of the following:

(1) Meets or exceeds the baseline product criteria of a NIST conforming labeling scheme.

(2) Satisfies a conformity assessment as described by a NIST conforming labeling scheme that includes a third-party test, inspection, or certification.

(3) Bears the binary label as described by a NIST conforming labeling scheme.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 860, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.   (AB 2392)   Effective January 1, 2023.   See similar section in the Title 1.81.26 added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.91.05.

For the purposes of this title, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Authentication” means a method of verifying the authority of a user, process, or device to access resources in an information system.

(b) “Connected device” means any device, or other physical object that is capable of connecting to the internet, directly or indirectly, and that is assigned an
 internet protocol address or Bluetooth address.

(c) “Manufacturer” means the person who manufactures, or contracts with another person to manufacture on the person’s behalf, connected devices that are sold or offered for sale in California. For the purposes of this subdivision, a contract with another person to manufacture on the person’s behalf does not include a contract only to purchase a connected device, or only to purchase and brand a connected device.

(d) “NIST conforming labeling scheme” means a labeling scheme conforming to the Cybersecurity White Paper titled “Recommended Criteria for Cybersecurity Labeling for Consumer Internet of Things (IoT) Products” published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology
 (NIST) on February 4,
 2022, including any revisions or successor publications.

(e) “Security feature” means a feature of a device designed to provide security for that device.

(f) “Unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure” means access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure that is not authorized by the consumer.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 860, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 785, Sec. 3.   (AB 2392)   Effective January 1, 2023.   See similar section in the Title 1.81.26 added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.91.06.

(a) This title shall not be construed to impose any duty upon the manufacturer of a connected device related to unaffiliated third-party software or applications that a user chooses to add to a connected device.

(b) This title shall not be construed to impose any duty upon a provider of an electronic store, gateway, marketplace, or other means of purchasing or downloading software or applications, to review or
 enforce compliance with this title.

(c) This title shall not be construed to impose any duty upon the manufacturer of a connected device to prevent a user from having full control over a connected device, including the ability to modify the software or firmware running on the device at the user’s discretion.

(d) This title shall not apply to any connected device the functionality of which is subject to security requirements under federal law, regulations, or guidance promulgated by a federal agency pursuant to its regulatory enforcement authority.

(e) This title shall not be construed to provide a basis for a private right of action. The Attorney General, a city attorney, a county counsel, or a district attorney shall have the exclusive authority to enforce this title.

(f) The duties and obligations imposed by this title are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under other law, and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(g) This title shall not be construed to limit the authority of a law enforcement agency to obtain connected device information from a manufacturer as authorized by law or pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(h) A covered entity, provider of health care, business associate, health care service plan, contractor, employer, or any other person subject to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) (Public Law 104-191) or the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1) shall not be
 subject to this title with respect to any activity regulated by those acts.

(i) This title shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 860, Sec. 1.   (AB 1906)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.   See similar section in the Title 1.81.26 added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.27. Commercial Use of Booking Photographs [1798.91.1. - 1798.91.1.]

1798.91.1.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Booking photograph” means a photograph of a subject individual taken pursuant to an arrest or other involvement in the criminal justice system.

(2) “Subject individual” means an individual who was arrested.

(3) “Person” means a natural person, partnership, joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, or other entity.

(4) “Public entity” means the state, county, city, special district, or other political subdivision therein.

(b) It shall be unlawful practice for any person engaged in publishing or otherwise disseminating a booking photograph through a print or electronic medium to solicit, require, or accept the payment of a fee or other consideration from a subject individual to remove, correct, modify, or to refrain from publishing or otherwise disseminating that booking photograph.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a public entity may require and accept a reasonable administrative fee to correct a booking photograph.

(d) Each payment solicited or accepted in violation of these provisions constitutes a separate violation.

(e) In addition to any other sanctions, penalties, or remedies provided by law, a subject individual may bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction against any person in violation of this section for damages in an amount equal to the greater of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation or the actual damages suffered by him or her as a result, along with costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and any other legal or equitable relief.

(f) The jurisdiction of a civil action brought pursuant to subdivision (e) shall also include the county in which the subject individual resides at the time of the violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   (SB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.3. IDENTITY THEFT [1798.92. - 1798.97.]

1798.92.

For the purposes of this title:

(a) “Claimant” means a person who has or purports to have a claim for money or an interest in property in connection with a transaction procured through identity theft.

(b) “Identity theft” means the unauthorized use of another person’s personal identifying information to obtain credit, goods, services, money, or property.

(c) “Personal identifying information” means a person’s name, address, telephone number, driver’s license number, social security number, place of employment, employee identification number, mother’s
 maiden name, demand deposit account number, savings account number, or credit card number.

(d) “Victim of identity theft” means a person who had their personal identifying information used without authorization by another to obtain credit, goods, services, money, or property, and did not use or possess the credit, goods, services, money, or property obtained by the identity theft, and has submitted a Federal Trade Commission identity theft report. In the alternative, the person may have filed a police report in this regard pursuant to Section 530.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 265, Sec. 3.   (AB 430)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.93.

(a) A person may bring an action against a claimant to establish that the person is a victim of identity theft in connection with the claimant’s claim against that person. If the claimant has brought an action to recover on its claim against the person, the person may file a cross-complaint to establish that the person is a victim of identity theft in connection with the claimant’s claim.

(b) A person shall establish that they are a victim of identity theft by a preponderance of the evidence.

(c) A person who proves that they are a victim of identity theft, as defined in Section 530.5 of the
 Penal Code, as to a particular claim, shall be entitled to a judgment providing all of the following, as appropriate:

(1) A declaration that they are not obligated to the claimant on that claim.

(2) A declaration that any security interest or other interest the claimant had purportedly obtained in the victim’s property in connection with that claim is void and unenforceable.

(3) An injunction restraining the claimant from collecting or attempting to collect from the victim on that claim, from enforcing
 or attempting to enforce any security interest or other interest in the victim’s property in connection with that claim, or from enforcing or executing on any judgment against the victim on that claim.

(4) If the victim has filed a cross-complaint against the claimant, the dismissal of any cause of action in the complaint filed by the claimant based on a claim which arose as a result of the identity theft.

(5) Actual damages, attorney’s fees, and costs, and any equitable relief that the court deems appropriate. In order to recover actual damages or attorney’s fees in an action or cross-complaint filed by a person alleging that they are a victim of identity theft, the person shall show that they provided written notice to the claimant that a situation of identity
 theft might exist, including, upon written request of the claimant, a valid, signed Federal Trade Commission (FTC) identity theft report completed at least 30 days before filing the action, or within their cross-complaint pursuant to this section. In the alternative, the person may provide a valid copy of a police report or of a Department of Motor Vehicles (DMV) investigative report, filed pursuant to Section 530.5 of the Penal Code,
 at least 30 days before filing the action or within their cross-complaint pursuant to this section. For the purposes of this paragraph, if the person submits an FTC identity theft report, the claimant shall not also require a DMV or police report.

(6) A civil penalty, in addition to any other damages, of up to thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) if the victim establishes by clear and convincing evidence all of the following:

(A) That at least 30 days prior to filing an action or within the cross-complaint pursuant to this section, they provided written notice to the claimant at the address designated by the claimant for complaints related to credit reporting issues that a
 situation of identity theft might exist and explaining the basis for that belief.

(B) That the claimant failed to diligently investigate the victim’s notification of a possible identity theft.

(C) That the claimant continued to pursue its claim against the victim after the claimant was presented with facts that were later held to entitle the victim to a judgment pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 265, Sec. 4.   (AB 430)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.94.

An action or cross-complaint brought under this title that joins other claimants as defendants in the same action or cross-complaint shall be deemed to comply with Section 379 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.95.
